Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 8
COMPREHENSIVE STATE-WIDE WATER MANAGEMENT PLANNING

Cross references.

- Protection of Metropolitan rivers, T. 12, C. 5, A. 5, P. 6.

Flint River drought protection, T. 12, C. 5, A. 9.

Metropolitan North Georgia Water Planning District, T. 12, C. 5, A. 10.

Editor's notes.

- Ga. L. 2004, p. 711,

§

1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "The General Assembly finds and declares that:

"(1) A comprehensive state-wide water management plan for this state is needed and should be developed by the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources;

"(2) Such plan should support a structured, yet flexible, approach to regional water planning and provide guidance and incentives for regional and local water planning efforts; and

"(3) Regional water planning efforts of the Environmental Protection Division should be coordinated with and not supplant the existing efforts of all state agencies."

Ga. L. 2004, p. 711,

§

2, effective May 13, 2004,
repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this article and enacted the current article. The former article consisted of Code Sections 12-5-520 through 12-5-525, relating to river basin management plans, and was based on Ga. L. 1992, p. 1896,

§

1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91,

§

12.

Administrative Rules and Regulations.

- Preparation of Regional Water Development and Conservation Plans, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Regional Water Planning, Sec. 391-3-32-.01.

Permitting based on regional water development and conservation plans, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Environmental Protection, Groundwater Use, Sec. 391-3-2-.16.

12-5-520. Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the "Comprehensive State-wide Water Management Planning Act."

(Code 1981, §

12-5-520

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 711, § 2.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Sharing Water Through Interbasin Transfer and Basis of Origin Protection in Georgia: Issues for Evaluation in Comprehensive State Water Planning for Georgia's Surface Water Rivers and Groundwater Aquifers," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (2004).
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-521. Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

"Director" means the director of the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Division" means the Environmental Protection Division of the Department of Natural Resources.

"Water Council" means the Water Council created by Code Section

12-5-524

.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-521

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 711, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 12/HB 95.)

12-5-522. Policy statement for comprehensive state-wide water management plan; guiding principles; requirements of plan; regional plans; compliance with plans.

The division shall develop and propose a comprehensive state-wide water management plan not inconsistent with this chapter and in accordance with the following policy statement: "Georgia manages water resources in a sustainable manner to support the state's economy, to protect public health and natural systems, and to enhance the quality of life for all citizens."

The following principles shall guide the work of the division in developing a comprehensive state-wide water management plan:

Effective water resources management protects public health and the safety and welfare of Georgia's citizens;

Water resources are to be managed in a sustainable manner so that current and future generations have access to adequate supplies of quality water that support both human needs and natural systems;

All citizens have a stewardship responsibility to conserve and protect the water resources of Georgia;

Water resources management efforts must have a sound scientific foundation and recognize that economic prosperity and environmental quality are interdependent;

Water quality and quantity and surface and ground water are interrelated and require integrated planning as well as reasonable and efficient use;

A comprehensive and accessible data base must be developed to provide sound scientific and economic information upon which effective water resources management decisions can be based;

Water resources management encourages local and regional innovation, implementation, adaptability, and responsibility for watershed and river basin management;

Sound water resources management involves meaningful participation, coordination, and cooperation among interested and affected stakeholders and citizens as well as all levels of governmental and other entities managing or utilizing water; and

Periodic revisions of the comprehensive state-wide water management plan may be required to accommodate new scientific and policy insights as well as changing social, economic, cultural, and environmental factors.

The proposed comprehensive state-wide water management plan shall set forth state-wide water policies not inconsistent with this chapter which shall guide river basin and aquifer management plans, regional water planning efforts, and local water plans.

The proposed comprehensive state-wide water management plan may include a process for creating draft river basin management plans and draft ground-water management plans and how such plans are finalized and revised, including the designation of persons responsible for developing regional water development and conservation plans, required contents of such plans, and how the public may participate in the creation and revision of such plans.

The division shall make all water withdrawal permitting decisions in accordance with this chapter, the comprehensive state-wide water management plan that has been approved or enacted by the General Assembly as provided by this article, and any applicable regional water development and conservation plan, including, but not limited to, restrictions, if any, on diversion from or reduction of flows in other watercourses. Any political subdivision or local water authority that is not in compliance with the plan shall be ineligible for state grants or loans for water projects, except for those projects designed to bring such political subdivision or local water authority into compliance with the plan.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-522

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 711, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 644, § 4-4/SB 342.)

12-5-523. Cooperation with Water Council; involvement of stakeholders; initial draft plan.

The division shall work in cooperation, coordination, and communication with the Water Council and any other state, local, regional, or federal agency as appropriate to develop a comprehensive state-wide water management plan.

The division shall solicit extensive stakeholder involvement in the development of the proposed plan. Such stakeholders shall include, without limitation, other state agencies, nonprofit advocacy organizations, business organizations, local government entities and associations of local government entities, and regional commissions.

The division shall submit a draft initial comprehensive state-wide water management plan to the Water Council for review no later than July 1, 2007.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-523

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 711, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 12/HB 95; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 19/HB 1216.)

Law reviews.

-
For article, "Sharing Water Through Interbasin Transfer and Basis of Origin Protection in Georgia: Issues for Evaluation in Comprehensive State Water Planning for Georgia's Surface Water Rivers and Groundwater Aquifers," see 21 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 339 (2004).
For note, "The Problem of Reallocation in a Regulated Riparian System: Examining the Law in Georgia," see 40 Ga. L. Rev. 207 (2005).

12-5-524. Water Council created; obligations of council.

There shall be a Water Council composed of one member appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives who shall not be a member of the General Assembly and who shall serve for a term of four years and until a successor is appointed and qualified; one member appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate who shall not be a member of the General Assembly and who shall serve for a term of four years and until a successor is appointed and qualified; and the following state officials who shall serve ex officio as members of the committee: the director of the division, the commissioner of natural resources, the executive director of the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission, the commissioner of community affairs, the commissioner of public health, the Commissioner of Agriculture, the director of the State Forestry Commission, and the executive director of the Georgia Environmental Finance Authority. In addition, the chairperson of the Senate Natural Resources and the Environment Committee, ex officio, and one additional member of that committee to be selected by its chairperson; and the chairperson of the House Committee on Natural Resources and Environment, ex officio, and one additional member of that committee to be selected by its chairperson, shall each serve in an advisory capacity. Any vacancy among the two appointed members of the Water Council who are not members of the General Assembly other than for expiration of term shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the unexpired term. The director shall serve as chairperson of the Water Council.

The Water Council shall:

Ensure coordination, cooperation, and communication among state agencies and their water related efforts in the development of a comprehensive state-wide water management plan;

Provide input to the division concerning the development of a comprehensive state-wide water management plan;

Review, modify if necessary, and approve the final draft of the proposed comprehensive state-wide water management plan; and

Recommend such initial proposed plan for consideration by the General Assembly not later than the first day of the regular session of the General Assembly next occurring after such completion but not later than the first day of the 2008 regular session of the General Assembly.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-524

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 711, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 12/HB 95; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 1-6/HB 228; Ga. L. 2010, p. 949, § 1/HB 244; Ga. L. 2011, p. 705, § 6-5/HB 214; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 12/HB 142.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2004, two punctuation changes were made in subsection (a).

Law reviews.

-
For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 147 (2011).

12-5-525. Approval by General Assembly; alternative to passage by legislature; emergency actions by Water Council in event of imminent peril; review and revision of plan.

No comprehensive state-wide water management plan submitted by the Water Council pursuant to this article shall have any force or effect unless approved by the General Assembly by means of the adoption of a joint resolution ratifying such plan, except as otherwise provided by this subsection. Upon the loss of any such resolution, the Water Council may submit successive alternate plans to the General Assembly not later than the twentieth day of the session for approval during such session.

Subject to the same development process as provided by subsections (a) and (b) of Code Section 12-5-523 and review, modification if necessary, and approval by the Water Council in the same manner provided by subsection (b) of Code Section 12-5-524, the division may subsequently propose to amend or repeal a plan approved under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph; but no such proposed amendment or repeal shall become effective unless an initial version thereof is submitted to the General Assembly not later than the first day of a session and the amendment or repeal is approved by the General Assembly in the same manner as provided by subparagraph (A) of this paragraph.

In lieu of approving a comprehensive state-wide water management plan in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, the General Assembly may enact a statutory comprehensive state-wide water management plan.

If:

The General Assembly fails to approve a comprehensive state-wide water management plan in accordance with subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection during the session in which such a proposed plan was timely presented by the Water Council to the General Assembly for approval; and

A statutory comprehensive state-wide water management plan provided by an Act of the General Assembly that expressly supersedes any and all comprehensive state-wide water management plans submitted by the Water Council to the General Assembly for approval does not become law on or before July 1 next occurring after the session in which such a proposed plan was timely submitted by the Water Council to the General Assembly for approval,

then the comprehensive state-wide water management plan submitted latest in time but not later than the twentieth day of the session by the Water Council to the General Assembly shall become of full force and effect without the approval of the General Assembly on July 1 next occurring after the session in which such proposed plan was timely presented to the General Assembly for approval.

If at any time after a comprehensive state-wide water management plan has become effective under subsection (a) of this Code section and between the adjournment sine die of a regular session of the General Assembly and prior to the convening date of the next regular session of the General Assembly the director finds that there is an actual or impending emergency or disaster of natural or human origin or a public health emergency within or affecting the state and that strict compliance with any provision or provisions of such plan presents an imminent peril to the public health, safety, or welfare and states in writing his or her reasons for those findings, the Water Council may approve a temporary waiver of such provision or provisions but only to the extent necessary to alleviate the peril. Such waiver shall be effective upon such approval by the Water Council and for not longer than the duration of the emergency or until the twentieth legislative day of the next regular session of the General Assembly, whichever first occurs.

After a comprehensive state-wide water management plan becomes effective pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the division shall review such plan in its current form not later than July 1, 2010, and at least every three years thereafter, for purposes of determining whether revision of such plan is necessary or appropriate for recommendation.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-525

, enacted by Ga. L. 2004, p. 711, § 2; Ga. L. 2005, p. 60, § 12/HB 95.)

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 2008, p. 1), effective February 6, 2008, the General Assembly ratified the comprehensive state-wide water management plan that the Water Council adopted on January 8, 2008, and submitted to the General Assembly on January 14, 2008.
The plan was filed with the office of the director of the Environmental Protection Division.